Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 1 Cruelty to Animals
4-1-28.
Greasy pig contests prohibited.

It is unlawful for any person, as defined in §

4-1-1

, to conduct any greasy pig contest within the state. Any person violating this section is subject to the provisions of §

4-1-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 114, § 2.

4-1-29.
Release of caged animals in park or zoo.

It is unlawful for any person to willfully release an animal from captivity in a park, circus, zoo or other such facility. Any person violating this section is be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 131, § 1.

4-1-30.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 185, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2019, ch. 115, § 1, effective July 8, 2019; P.L. 2019, ch. 147, § 1, effective July 8, 2019.

4-1-30.1.
Cruelty to public safety — Dogs and horses.

As used in this section:

“Police canine” means any canine and “police horse” means any horse that is owned or in the service of a law enforcement agency for the principal purpose of aiding in the detection of criminal activity, enforcement of laws, maintaining public order, or apprehension of offenders;

“Fire canine” means any canine that is owned or in the service of a fire department, a special fire district, or the state fire marshal for the principal purpose of aiding in the detection of flammable materials or the investigation of fires; and

“SAR canine” means any search and rescue canine that is owned or in the service of a fire department, a law enforcement agency, a special fire district, or the state fire marshal for the principal purpose of aiding in the detection of missing persons, including, but not limited to, persons who are lost; who are trapped under debris as the result of a natural, manmade, or technological disaster; or who are drowning victims.

Penalties:

Any person who intentionally and knowingly, without lawful cause or justification, causes great bodily harm, permanent disability, or death to, or uses a deadly weapon upon, a police canine, fire canine, SAR canine, or police horse commits a felony, shall be imprisoned not exceeding five (5) years or be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), and shall, in the case of any animal of another, be liable to the owner of this animal for triple damages, to be recovered by civil action. In addition, any person convicted under this section shall be required to serve fifty (50) hours of community restitution. That community restitution penalty shall not be suspended or deferred and is mandatory.

Any person who actually and intentionally maliciously touches, strikes, or causes bodily harm to a police canine, fire canine, SAR canine, or police horse commits a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment of not more than one year, or both.

Any person who intentionally or knowingly maliciously harasses, teases, interferes with, or attempts to interfere with a police canine, fire canine, SAR canine, or police horse while the animal is in the performance of its duties commits a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisonment of not more than one year, or both.

Except as provided in subsection (b)(1), any person convicted under this section shall make full restitution for injuries sustained by the police canine, fire canine, SAR canine, or police horse and shall pay the replacement cost of any dog or horse if that animal can no longer perform its public safety duties. Any canine that is owned by or employed by a law enforcement agency shall be exempt from restitution requirements of this subsection.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 115, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 147, § 2.

4-1-31.
Assignment of state veterinarian.

Examination of fighting animals. A licensed veterinarian from the department of environmental management, shall be made available to agents of the Rhode Island Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals at the request of the state police for the purpose of examining any animal that those agents believe to have been involved in animal fighting in violation of §§

4-1-2

,

4-1-8

,

4-1-9

or

4-1-11

.

Right of entry where cruelty suspected. The director of the department of environmental management, or any veterinarian employed by the department of environmental management designated by the director for such purpose, having reason to suspect the existence of cruelty to animals within the meaning of this chapter upon any grounds or premises, is hereby authorized and empowered to enter upon those grounds or premises for enforcement of the provisions of this chapter. For such inspections, the department shall, unless a search without a warrant is otherwise allowed by law, seek a search warrant from an official of a court authorized to issue warrants.

The director of the department of environmental management may designate a department veterinarian or veterinarians to act as animal advocates. A general agent or special agent from the Rhode Island Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals may also act in that capacity.

The animal advocate shall make recommendations to any court before which the custody or well-being of an animal is at issue.

Any animal care facility licensed by the United States Department of Agriculture or holding a public health service (PHS) assurance of compliance shall be exempt from the provisions of this section.

Right to seize animals that are the subject of cruel treatment. The director of environmental management, or any veterinarian employed by the department of environmental management (“department”), shall have the authority to examine any animal that is suspected of being cruelly treated, mistreated, or neglected by its owner, guardian, or his or her agents in violation of the provisions of chapter 1 of this title. Upon reasonable evidence to suggest that the subject animal(s) has been cruelly treated, mistreated, or negligently treated by the owner, guardian, or his or her agents, in violation of the provisions of chapter 1 of this title, the department may lawfully take charge of that animal(s) and shall have the authority to seize said animal(s). Any animal(s) so seized shall remain in the custody of the department during the pendency of any civil or criminal investigation and remain in the custody of the department until the adjudication of the matter. All reasonable expenses for the care and treatment of the animal(s), while in the custody of the department during this time, shall be paid for by the owner, guardian, or his or her agent upon conviction, entry of a guilty plea, or a plea of nolo contendere. The department has the authority to commence a civil action for damages against the owner, guardian, or his or her agent thirty (30) days after written demand for payment of the expenses of the suitable care of that animal has been sent and no payment received.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 398, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 193, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 261, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 321, § 1.

4-1-32.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 306, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1984, ch. 351, § 1, effective May 11, 1984. For present provisions of law, see §

4-1-2

.

4-1-33.
Persons using animals for research — Registration.

Any person, firm, partnership, or corporation actively engaged in animal research, who actually utilizes live animals for research purposes, shall register with the department of health by filing with the department of health on forms provided by it, the full name, address and type of research performed by the particular person, firm, partnership, or corporation involved in animal research. Any person who violates any of the provisions of this section shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Upon passage of this section the department of health shall publish a notice containing the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 479, § 1.

4-1-34.
Destruction of racing greyhounds.

No person shall put to death, within the state, a racing greyhound or a retired racing greyhound except in a humane manner. For the purposes of this section, the phrase in a humane manner means by means of euthanasia by lethal injection, or by any other standard of humane killing that may be established by the American veterinary medicine association.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 465, § 1.

4-1-34.1.
Restriction on sale of greyhounds.

No person, firm, or other business entity shall sell or otherwise transfer any greyhound or retired racing greyhound to any person, firm, or other business entity for the purpose of medical research.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 465, § 1.

4-1-34.2.
Autopsies and medical treatment permitted.

Nothing contained in this chapter prohibits the owner of a greyhound from having an autopsy performed on that greyhound, nor prohibits any medical treatment necessary to maintain the health and well being of a greyhound.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 465, § 1.

4-1-34.3.
Violations — Penalties.

Any person found guilty of violating §

4-1-34

or

4-1-34

.1 shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 465, § 1.

4-1-35.
Community restitution.

The general assembly hereby declares that the words “community service” which appear throughout this chapter shall now be substituted with and referred to as “community restitution”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 454, § 7.

4-1-36.
Psychiatric counseling.

Any person found guilty of violating any of the provisions of this chapter may, in addition to any penalties imposed, be evaluated to determine the need for psychiatric or psychological counseling, and, if determined appropriate by the court, to receive psychiatric or psychological counseling at his or her own expense.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 321, § 1.

4-1-37.
Immunity from suit.

Any person entrusted with the care and custody of an animal, including, but not limited to, any Rhode Island licensed veterinarian, veterinarian technician, animal shelter, or animal kennel, shall be held harmless from either criminal or civil liability arising out of any reports, either oral or written, made to local or state police, animal control officials, or officers of private organizations devoted to humane treatment of animals, concerning any animal that the veterinarian knows, or reasonably believed, to be abandoned, neglected, or abused, and shall be immune from suit by reason of making the report. Provided, however, that a veterinarian who participates or reports in bad faith or with malice shall not be protected under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 322, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 172, § 1.

4-1-38.
Use of the terms owner or guardian.

Wherever the word “owner” shall appear in this chapter it shall also mean and may be interchanged with the word “guardian” as defined in §

4-1-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 72, § 2.

4-1-39.
Transport and shelter of horses.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person may not transport or shelter, or cause or allow to be transported or sheltered any equine animal in or upon any trailer, conveyance or other vehicle whatsoever with two (2) or more levels stacked on top of one another.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be subject to a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) per animal for a first offense, and subject to a fine of at least one thousand dollars ($1,000) per animal for all second and subsequent offenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 414, § 1.

4-1-40.
Possession of animals.

In addition to any other penalty imposed by law, a person convicted of, or who entered a plea of nolo contendere to, any misdemeanor violation under the provisions of this chapter shall not possess or reside with any animal for a period of up to five (5) years following entry of the conviction or upon acceptance of a plea of nolo contendere by the court. Any offense under this subsection is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment for a term not more than one year, or both, and forfeiture of the animal(s).

In addition to any other penalty imposed by law, a person convicted of, or who entered a plea of nolo contendere to, any felony violation under the provisions of this chapter shall not possess or reside with any animal for a period of up to fifteen (15) years following entry of the conviction or upon acceptance of a plea of nolo contendere by the court. Any offense under this subsection is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment for a term not more than one year, or both, and forfeiture of the animal(s).

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 200, § 1.

4-1-41.
Devocalization or declawing as requirement for property occupancy prohibited.

No person or corporation that occupies, owns, manages, or provides services in connection with any real property, including the individual’s or corporation’s agents or successors-in-interest, may do any of the following if the person or corporation allows an animal on the subject premises:

Advertise, through any means, the availability of real property for occupancy in a manner designed to discourage application for occupancy of that real property because the applicant’s animal has not been declawed or devocalized;

Refuse to allow the occupancy of any real property, refuse to negotiate the occupancy of any real estate property, or to otherwise make unavailable or deny to any other person the occupancy of any real property because of that person’s refusal to declaw or devocalize any animal; or

Require any tenant or occupant of real property to declaw or devocalize any animal allowed on the premises.

Any person found in violation of this section shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a person fined under this section may be barred from owning or possessing any animals, or living on the same property with someone who owns or possesses animals, for a period of time deemed appropriate by the court, and be required to take humane education, pet ownership and dog training classes as ordered by the court.

Nothing contained within this section shall be construed as forbidding a person or corporation that occupies, owns, manages, or provides services in connection with any real property, including the individual’s or corporation’s agents or successors-in-interest, from prohibiting any animal on the premises.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 318, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 431, § 1.

4-1-42.
Care of neglected animals by department — Forfeiture of owner’s rights — Expenses.

The director of environmental management, or any veterinarian employed by the department of environmental management (“department”), may lawfully take charge of any animal found abandoned or neglected or hazardously accumulated as defined in §

4-1-1

, or that, in the opinion of the department, is aged, maimed, disabled, lame, sick, diseased, injured, unfit for the labor it is performing, or cruelly treated, and shall give notice to the owner, if known, or his or her agents, and may provide suitable care.

Every owner, guardian, or agent, upon conviction, entry of a guilty plea, or plea of nolo contendere, of abandonment, neglect, hazardous accumulation as defined in §

4-1-1

, or otherwise cruel treatment of any animal taken charge of by the department under this section, forfeits the right to ownership or control of that animal to the department for disposition in any manner deemed suitable for that animal.

Whenever the department lawfully takes charge of any animal under this section, all reasonable expenses for the care and treatment of the animal(s), while in the custody of the department during this time, shall be paid for by the owner, guardian, or his or her agent, upon conviction, a plea of guilty or plea of nolo contendere. The department has the authority to commence a civil action for damages against the owner or his or her agent thirty (30) days after written demand for payment of the expense of the suitable care of that animal has been sent and no payment received.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 261, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 321, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 439, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 444, § 1.

4-1-43.
Use of bullhooks or similar devices on elephants prohibited.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person who houses, possesses, or is in direct contact with an elephant utilized in a traveling show shall not:

Use a bullhook, ankus, baseball bat, axe handle, pitchfork, or similar device designed to inflict pain for the purpose of training or controlling the behavior of an elephant; or

Permit an employee, agent, or contractor to use a bullhook, ankus, baseball bat, axe handle, pitchfork, or similar device designed to inflict pain for the purpose of training or controlling the behavior of an elephant.

For purposes of this section “traveling show” means a circus, public show, trade show, photographic opportunity, carnival, city or county fair, ride, parade, race, performance or similar undertaking that involves transporting elephants from location to location or otherwise moves elephants away from a place of permanent residency for performance purposes. The term “traveling show” does not include the transportation of an elephant between nonprofit United States Department of Agriculture licensed sanctuaries for the purpose of providing lifetime care.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation, or imprisoned for not more than one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 506, § 1.